Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 6

Remedies for Delinquent Payment or Nonpayment

66-34-601. Interest.

Any payment not made in accordance with this chapter accrues interest, from the date due until the date paid, at the rate of interest for delinquent payments provided in written contract or, if no interest rate is specified in a written contract, then one and one-half percent (1.5%) per month.

Acts 1991, ch. 45, § 1; 2000, ch. 712, § 1; 2020, ch. 749, § 29.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “accrues” for “shall accrue” and “then one and one-half percent (1.5%) per month.” for “at the rate specified in §47-14-121.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

66-34-602. Nonpayment — Notice of intent to seek relief under chapter — Remedies — Attorney's fees — Bond.

A prime contractor who has not received payment from an owner, or a remote contractor who has not received payment from a prime contractor or other remote contractor, in accordance with this chapter, or any prime contractor or remote contractor that intends to seek to recover funds as permitted by § 66-34-205 and this section, shall notify the party failing to make payment of the notifying party's intent to seek relief against that party as provided in this chapter.

The notification must be made by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, or by another commercial delivery service that provides written confirmation of delivery.

If the notified party does not, within ten (10) calendar days after receipt of the notice, make payment or provide to the notifying party a response giving adequate legal reasons for failure of the notified party to make payment, then the notifying party may, in addition to all other remedies available at law or in equity, sue for equitable relief, including injunctive relief, for continuing violations of this chapter in the chancery court of the county in which the real property is located.

The failure to make the only payment due under the contract may be considered a continuing violation under this chapter.

The notification required by this part may be sent separately or as part of any notice of nonpayment or other notice required under the contract and may be in substantially the following form:

This letter shall serve as notice pursuant to the Tennessee Prompt Pay Act, Tenn. Code Ann. §§66-34-101 et seq., of [prime contractor or remote contractor]'s intent to seek relief under the Prompt Pay Act. [Prime contractor or remote contractor] furnished [description of labor, materials, or services furnished] in furtherance of improvements to real property located at [property description] pursuant to its written contract with [lender, owner, prime contractor, or remote contractor]. [Prime contractor or remote contractor] first furnished labor, materials, or services on [insert first date] and [“is still continuing to perform” or “last furnished labor, materials, or services on (insert date)”]. If [owner, prime contractor, and/or remote contractor] fail(s) to make payment, arrange for payment, or provide a response setting forth adequate legal reasons for the failure to make payment to [prime contractor or remote contractor] within ten (10) days of your receipt of this letter, then [prime contractor or remote contractor] may, in addition to all other remedies at law or in equity, file a lawsuit for equitable relief, including injunctive relief, for continuing violations of this chapter.

If an owner does not make payment to a prime contractor or furnish a response setting forth adequate legal reasons for the owner's failure to make payment within ten (10) days of receipt of the notice required by subsection (a), then the prime contractor may stop work until payment is received or until the owner provides a response setting forth adequate legal reasons for the owner's failure to make payment, as long as the prime contractor is not otherwise in default of the written contract. If, in accordance with subsection (a), the owner makes payment or provides a response setting forth adequate legal reasons for the failure to pay the prime contractor, then the prime contractor shall not stop work pursuant to this section.

If a prime contractor does not make payment to a remote contractor or furnish a response setting forth adequate legal reasons for the prime contractor's failure to make payment within ten (10) days of receipt of the notice required by subsection (a), then the remote contractor may stop work until payment is received or until the prime contractor provides a response setting forth adequate legal reasons for the prime contractor's failure to make payment, as long as the remote contractor is not otherwise in default of the written contract. If, in accordance with subsection (a), the prime contractor makes payment or provides a response setting forth adequate legal reasons for the failure to pay the remote contractor, then the remote contractor shall not stop work pursuant to this section.

Any work stoppage by a prime contractor or a remote contractor in accordance with this section entitles the prime contractor or remote contractor to an extension of the contract schedule, if any, equal to the length of the work stoppage.

Reasonable attorney's fees may be awarded against the nonprevailing party if the nonprevailing party acted in bad faith.

A bond in the amount claimed or ordered to be paid must be filed with good sureties to be approved by the clerk prior to the issuance of any injunctive relief.

Acts 1991, ch. 45, § 1; 2020, ch. 749, § 30.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote (a)(1) which read: “A contractor who has not received payment from an owner, or a subcontractor, materialman or furnisher who has not received payment from a contractor or other subcontractor, materialman or furnisher, in accordance with this chapter, shall notify the party failing to make payment of the provisions of this chapter and of the notifying party's intent to seek relief provided for within this chapter.”; added “, or by another commercial delivery service that provides written confirmation of delivery.” in (a)(2); added (a)(5) – (c); redesignated former (b) as present (d) and substituted “if the nonprevailing” for “; provided, that such nonprevailing”; and redesignated former (c) as present (e) and deleted “double” preceding “the amount” in present (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

66-34-603. Additional rights of prime contractors and remote contractors — Reasonable assurances.

In addition to any rights provided for under any contract:

Prior to visible commencement of operations, and upon written request by a prime contractor, the owner shall furnish a prime contractor reasonable evidence the owner has procured a loan, which may be secured by a mortgage or other encumbrance, or has otherwise made financial arrangements sufficient to make all payments in accordance with the contract;

After visible commencement of operations, a prime contractor or a remote contractor may, upon the owner's failure to make payments as required by the written contract, provide notice in accordance with § 66-34-602(a). Included within the notice, a prime contractor or remote contractor may request that the owner provide reasonable evidence that the owner has made financial arrangements sufficient to fulfill its obligation to make all payments in accordance with the written contract;

An owner shall provide a response to a demand for reasonable assurances within ten (10) days of receipt of the request that:

Provides reasonable evidence that the owner has made financial arrangements sufficient to fulfill the owner's obligation to make all payments in accordance with the written contract, including the information set forth in § 66-34-104(d); or

Provides adequate legal reasons for the owner's failure to make payment of the sums owing to the requesting party;

If an owner responds to a demand for adequate assurance with reasonable evidence that the owner has made financial arrangements sufficient to fulfill the owner's obligation to make all payments in accordance with the written contract, then the owner shall not materially vary the owner's financial arrangements from those disclosed under this section without prior notice to the prime contractor or remote contractor; and

A demand for reasonable assurances may be sent separately or as part of any notice of nonpayment, notice pursuant to § 66-34-602(a), or other notice required or permitted under the contract, and may be in substantially the following form:

[Prime contractor or remote contractor] furnished labor, materials, or services in furtherance of improvements to real property located at [property description] pursuant to its written contract with [owner, prime contractor, or remote contractor]. As of the date of this letter, [owner, prime contractor, or remote contractor] owes [prime contractor or remote contractor] the sum of [amount past due], which is past due or for which [prime contractor or remote contractor] asserts it has not been paid from [owner]. Such amounts were due on or before [insert due date] pursuant to the written contract between the parties. Pursuant to T.C.A. §66-34-603, [prime contractor or remote contractor] demands [owner] furnish reasonable evidence that [owner] has made financial arrangements sufficient to fulfill its obligation to make all payments in accordance with the written contract or setting forth adequate legal reasons for your failure to make payment, within ten (10) days of your receipt of this letter.

This section may not be waived by contract.

This section does not apply to the state and any department, board, or agency thereof, including the University of Tennessee; counties and municipalities and all departments, boards, or agencies thereof, including all school and education boards; and any other subdivision of this state.

Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 31.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which enacted this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.